Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 15 Pickled Fish

21-15-1.
Duties of packers.

In every city or town in which pickled fish are packed for sale or exportation from the state, the packers of every city or town shall see that the fish have been properly pickled and that they are properly repackaged in casks, in good shipping order, with good salt sufficient in each cask to preserve the fish from damage in transportation to any foreign port.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-1

.

21-15-2.
Packer’s bond.

Every packer shall give bond to the city or town treasurer of the city or town in which the packer shall be appointed, in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), with sufficient surety or sureties to the satisfaction of the city or town treasurer, for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-2

.

21-15-3.
One kind of fish in cask.

Pickled fish, whether codfish, mackerel, menhaden, herrings, or other fish, shall be sorted and one kind only be put into the same cask.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-3

.

21-15-4.
Construction, size, and packing of casks.

Every cask shall be well seasoned and bound with twelve (12) hoops. Casks for menhaden and herrings shall be of the capacity to hold twenty-eight gallons (28 gals.), and those for other fish of the capacity, if a barrel, to hold two hundred pounds (200 lbs.), and if a half barrel, one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) weight of fish. Each cask shall be full and the fish shall be sound and well cured.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-4

.

21-15-5.
Inspection and branding of casks.

Every cask before being packed or repacked for exportation shall first be searched, examined, and approved by a packer; and shall, when packed or repacked for exportation, be branded legibly on one head with the kind of fish it contains and the weight of the fish or the capacity of the cask with the first letter of the first name and the whole of the surname of the packer, the name of the town, and the words Rhode Island, in letters not less than three-fourths of an inch (3/4") long, to denote that the cask is merchantable and in good order for exportation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-5

.

21-15-6.
Branding of codfish casks as to quality.

Every cask of pickled codfish offered for sale or for exportation from the state shall also be branded “No. 1,” or “No. 2,” or “No. 3,” to denote the quality of the fish.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-6

.

21-15-7.
Grading of mackerel — Bloaters.

There shall be five (5) qualities of mackerel. Mackerel of the best quality, not mutilated, measuring not less than fourteen inches (14") from the extremity of the head to the notch or fork of the tail, free from rust, taint, or damage, and that shall count not more than one hundred fifty (150) fish to the barrel, shall be branded on the barrel or covering containing them “Bloaters.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-7

.

21-15-8.
Number one mackerel.

Mackerel of the best quality, not mutilated, being not less than thirteen inches (13"), measured as provided in §

21-15-7

, free from rust, taint, or damage, that shall count not more than two hundred (200) fish to the barrel, shall be branded “Number one.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-8

.

21-15-9.
Number two mackerel.

Mackerel being not less than eleven inches (11"), measured as provided in §

21-15-7

, free from rust, taint, or damage, and that shall count not more than three hundred fifty (350) fish to the barrel, shall be branded “Number two.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-9

.

21-15-10.
Number three mackerel.

Mackerel of the next inferior quality, free from taint or damage, not less than ten inches (10"), measured as provided in §

21-15-7

, that shall not count more than five hundred (500) fish to the barrel, shall be branded “Number three.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-10

.

21-15-11.
Number four mackerel.

All other mackerel, free from taint or damage, shall be branded “Number four.”

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-11

.

21-15-12.
Stamping as to quality of mackerel.

No person or persons shall sell or offer for sale any mackerel without having stamped, upon the barrel or covering containing the barrel, in a plain and legible manner the quality of the fish as classified in §§

21-15-7

—

21-15-11

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-12

.

21-15-13.
Sales and shipments by fishermen unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to prevent any fishermen or owners of fish, coming to this state from their fishing trips, from selling or reshipping their fish to any other of the United States without being packed into barrels or half barrels.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-13

.

21-15-14.
Sale or export of pickled fish not approved and branded.

Every person who shall offer for sale in or attempt to export from the state any pickled fish which have not been approved by a sworn packer, or in casks which are not branded as required in this chapter, shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-14

.

21-15-15.
Transfer of fish from branded casks — Misbranding.

Every person who shall shift any fish from any cask after the cask has been branded by the packer, and shall offer to sell or export the fish from this state, or shall brand any cask into which the fish shall be shifted, or shall brand any cask with the branding iron of a packer or with any iron made in imitation of it, shall be fined not less than thirty dollars ($30.00) nor more than one hundred sixty dollars ($160) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-15

.

21-15-16.
Fraud or neglect by packers.

Every packer who shall be guilty of any fraud or neglect in packing any fish contrary to this chapter, or shall brand any cask not thoroughly examined according to the provisions of this chapter, shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-16

.

21-15-17.
Packers’ fees.

The packers of fish shall be paid for opening, assorting, inspecting, weighing, pickling, packing, or repacking, heading up, nailing, and giving a certificate, if pickled codfish or mackerel, twenty cents ($0.20) for every barrel and fifteen cents ($0.15) for every half barrel by the owner of the fish; provided, that for all pickled codfish or mackerel which have been inspected in one of the United States and which shall not in the judgment of the packer require repacking, the owner shall only pay to the packer twenty cents ($0.20) for unheading, inspecting, reheading, branding, nailing, and giving a certificate of the work, and for all other, except codfish and mackerel, the owner of the fish shall pay the packer twenty-five cents ($0.25) for every cask.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 134, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 160, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 190, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 380, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

21-15-17

.